Maryland, session 2026, SB0624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
9–101.
– 1 –

Ch. 10 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Sleeping area” means a space that includes one or more sleeping rooms and
a hall or common area immediately adjacent to any sleeping room.
(d) “Sleeping room” means an enclosed room with a bed arranged to be used as a
bedroom.
(e) “Smoke alarm” means a single or multiple station device that detects visible
or invisible products of combustion and includes a built–in internal alarm signal.
SUBTITLE 11. SHORT–TERM RENTAL FIRE SAFETY REQUIREMENTS.
9–1101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “BOOKING SERVICE” MEANS A PERSON WHO, DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY:
(I) PROVIDES ONE OR MORE ONLINE, COMPUTER, OR
APPLICATION–BASED PLATFORMS THAT INDIVIDUALLY OR COLLECTIVELY CAN BE
USED TO:
1. LIST OR ADVERTISE OFFERS FOR SHORT–TERM
RENTALS; AND
2. A. ACCEPT OFFERS FOR SHORT–TERM RENTALS;
OR
B. ALLOW RESERVATION OR PAYMENT FOR
SHORT–TERM RENTALS; AND
(II) CHARGES, COLLECTS, OR RECEIVES A FEE FOR THE USE OF
THE PLATFORM OR FOR ANY SERVICE PROVIDED IN CONNECTION WITH A
SHORT–TERM RENTAL.
(2) “BOOKING SERVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PLATFORM THAT
SOLELY LISTS OR ADVERTISES OFFERS FOR SHORT–TERM RENTALS.
(C) “CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–1101
OF THIS ARTICLE.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
(C) (D) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101
OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(D) (E) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL HOST” MEANS A PERSON IN LEGAL
POSSESSION OF A SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT WHO RENTS THE UNIT TO GUESTS.
(E) (F) “SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11–101 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(F) (G) “SLEEPING AREA” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–101 OF THIS
TITLE.
(G) (H) “SMOKE ALARM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–101 OF THIS
TITLE.
9–1102.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO A SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT OFFERED FOR
SHORT–TERM RENTAL FOR LESS THAN 30 CONSECUTIVE DAYS.
9–1103.
(A) IN A SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT, A SHORT–TERM RENTAL HOST SHALL:
(1) CONSPICUOUSLY POST AN EVACUATION DIAGRAM IDENTIFYING
ALL EXITS FROM THE SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE EXITS
FROM THE BUILDING IN WHICH THE SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT IS LOCATED;
(2) CONSPICUOUSLY POST A LIST OF EMERGENCY TELEPHONE
NUMBERS FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT AND FIRE RESCUE SERVICES;
(3) PROVIDE A WORKING FIRE EXTINGUISHER IN THE SHORT–TERM
RENTAL UNIT; AND
(4) PROVIDE WORKING SMOKE ALARMS AND CARBON MONOXIDE
ALARMS IN THE SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT.
(B) (1) A SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A SMOKE
ALARM OR CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL BE:
– 3 –

Ch. 10 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
INSTALLED AND MAINTAINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH STATE, COUNTY, AND
MUNICIPAL FIRE CODES; AND.
(II) (2) IF IF MULTIPLE SMOKE ALARMS ARE REQUIRED TO BE
INSTALLED AND MAINTAINED IN THE SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT, EACH SMOKE
ALARM SHALL:
(I) BE INTERCONNECTED WITH OTHER SMOKE ALARMS SO
THAT THE ACTIVATION OF ONE SMOKE ALARM ACTIVATES ALL SMOKE ALARMS IN
THE SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT; OR
(II) COMPLY WITH AN ALTERNATIVE REQUIREMENT
AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE
FIRE PREVENTION COMMISSION.
(2) (3) A WHEN ACTIVATED, A SMOKE ALARM OR CARBON
MONOXIDE ALARM SOUND FOR A SMOKE ALARM REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE SOUND AN ALARM THAT IS:
(I) CLEARLY AUDIBLE IN ALL SLEEPING ROOMS AND SLEEPING
AREAS IN A SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT; AND
(II) LOUD ENOUGH TO BE HEARD OVER BACKGROUND NOISE
AND WITH ALL DOORS CLOSED BETWEEN THE SLEEPING ROOMS IN A SLEEPING AREA
AND THE SMOKE ALARM OR CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM.
(3) (4) A SMOKE ALARM OR CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE REPLACED IF THE SMOKE ALARM OR SMOKE
DETECTOR CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM:
(I) STOPS FUNCTIONING;
(II) IS MORE THAN 10 YEARS OLD BASED ON THE PRODUCTION
DATE MARKED ON THE BACK OF THE DEVICE; OR
(III) HAS NO PRODUCTION DATE ON THE BACK OF THE DEVICE.
9–1104.
A BOOKING SERVICE SHALL:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
(1) ELECTRONICALLY NOTIFY ALL SHORT–TERM RENTAL HOSTS
THAT USE THE BOOKING SERVICE OF THE FIRE SAFETY REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(2) REQUIRE EACH SHORT–TERM RENTAL HOST THAT USES THE
BOOKING SERVICE TO PROVIDE TO THE BOOKING SERVICE CONFIRMATION
DOCUMENTATION PROVIDED TO THE SHORT–TERM RENTAL HOST UNDER § 9–1105
OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR EACH SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT OWNED BY THE
SHORT–TERM RENTAL HOST.
9–1105.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A COUNTY OR BALTIMORE CITY
THAT PROHIBITS SHORT–TERM RENTALS IN THE JURISDICTION.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, EACH COUNTY AND BALTIMORE CITY
SHALL, BY LOCAL LAW OR REGULATION:
(1) REQUIRE THE ANNUAL INSPECTION OF ALL SHORT–TERM RENTAL
UNITS IN THE JURISDICTION FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF §
9–1103 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL ON OR BEFORE
JULY 1, 2028, SUMMARIZING:
(I) EACH LOCAL LAW OR REGULATION ADOPTED ON OR AFTER
OCTOBER 1, 2026, GOVERNING THE INSPECTION OF SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNITS
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(II) EACH LOCAL LAW OR REGULATION IN EFFECT BEFORE
OCTOBER 1, 2026, GOVERNING THE INSPECTION OF SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNITS
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, INCLUDING THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF
THE LAW OR REGULATION;
(III) THE NUMBER OF SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNITS IN THE
JURISDICTION INSPECTED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(IV) THE NUMBER OF SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNITS IN THE
JURISDICTION THAT ARE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF §
9–1103 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
– 5 –

Ch. 10 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) (C) A COUNTY OR BALTIMORE CITY MAY ESTABLISH A FEE TO COVER
THE COST OF INSPECTION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) (B)(1) OF THIS
SECTION.
(C) (D) (1) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL, A
COUNTY OR BALTIMORE CITY MAY DELEGATE THE INSPECTION OF SHORT–TERM
RENTAL UNITS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) (B) OF THIS SECTION TO A
THIRD–PARTY INSPECTOR WHO:
(1) (I) MEETS THE QUALIFICATIONS, INSURANCE REQUIREMENTS,
AND PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL; AND
(2) (II) IS CERTIFIED BY A NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED FIRE SAFETY
ORGANIZATION.
(2) THE OFFICE OF THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL SHALL ESTABLISH
THE MINIMUM REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS, CERTIFICATIONS, AND LICENSING FOR
A THIRD–PARTY INSPECTOR UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) (E) IF THE PERSON CONDUCTING THE INSPECTION UNDER THIS
SECTION FINDS A SHORT–TERM RENTAL UNIT TO BE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF § 9–1103 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE PERSON SHALL PROVIDE TO
THE SHORT–TERM RENTAL HOST A CERTIFICATE, RECEIPT, OR OTHER
DOCUMENTATION OF COMPLIANCE.
9–1106.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) REQUIRE A COUNTY OR BALTIMORE CITY TO AUTHORIZE THE USE
OF SHORT–TERM RENTALS IN THE JURISDICTION; OR
(2) PREEMPT OR PROHIBIT A COUNTY OR BALTIMORE CITY FROM
ENACTING OTHER MEASURES REGARDING SHORT–TERM RENTALS IN THE
JURISDICTION IN ADDITION TO THE MEASURES REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
12–1101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Carbon monoxide alarm” means a device that:
(1) senses carbon monoxide;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 10
(2) when sensing carbon monoxide, is capable of emitting a distinct and
audible sound;
(3) is listed and carries the listing of a nationally recognized testing
laboratory approved by the Office of the State Fire Marshal; and
(4) (i) is wired into an alternating current (AC) powerline with
secondary battery backup; or
(ii) for a hotel, a lodging or rooming house, or a rental dwelling unit:
1. is wired into an alternating current (AC) powerline with
secondary battery backup;
2. is battery–powered, sealed, tamper resistant, and using a
long–life battery that has a life of not less than 10 years; or
3. is connected to an on–site control unit that monitors the
carbon monoxide alarm remotely so that a responsible party is alerted when the device
activates the alarm signal and receives its primary power from a battery or the control unit.
Article – Tax – General
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j–1) “Short–term rental” means the temporary use of a short–term rental unit to
provide accommodation to transient guests for lodging purposes in exchange for
consideration.
(j–3) (1) “Short–term rental unit” means a residential dwelling unit or a portion
of the unit used for short–term rentals.
(2) “Short–term rental unit” includes a single–family house or dwelling, a
multifamily house or dwelling, an apartment, a condominium, or a cooperative.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before October 1, 2028,
the State Fire Marshal shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, on the information reported to the State Fire Marshal by
the counties and Baltimore City in accordance with this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 7 –